Hawaii, session 2026, SB3254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that community health centers are an essential component of Hawaii's health care system, providing primary and preventive care regardless of the person's ability to pay and serving medically underserved, low‑income, rural, and geographically isolated communities. Rising energy costs and increasing risks of power disruptions threaten the ability of nonprofit community health centers to sustain operations and deliver critical services, particularly during disasters and emergencies. The legislature further finds that solar-powered microgrids with energy storage provide a reliable and cost-effective solution to ensure continuity of health care services during grid outages, reduce long-term operating costs, and strengthen community resilience.  The Hawaii Primary Care Association has demonstrated capacity to steward public funds and coordinate multi-site initiatives that strengthen the sustainability of community health centers statewide.  In partnership with mission-driven clean energy partners, the association proposes to deploy resilient energy systems at community health centers located in medically underserved communities across multiple islands. The legislature further finds that the proposed projects leverage substantial private, philanthropic, and incentive-based funding, but require limited state support to close a remaining financing gap.  Without timely state investment, participating health centers risk losing access to federal tax credits and other incentives, jeopardizing project viability and the opportunity to achieve long-term cost savings that can be reinvested into patient care and essential services. Accordingly, the legislature finds that providing a grant pursuant to chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to support this initiative serves a valid public purpose by preserving access to essential health services, protecting vulnerable populations, and strengthening statewide disaster readiness and energy resilience. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 as a grant pursuant to chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for the Hawaii Primary Care Association to support the development and deployment of solar-plus-storage microgrids at nonprofit community health centers located in medically underserved communities across the State, including: (1)  Hawaii Island Community Health Center, Hilo facilities; (2)  Hawaii Island Community Health Center, Kau Family Health and Dental; (3)  Hawaii Island Community Health Center, Keaau Family Health and Dental; (4)  Hana Health; (5)  Molokai Ohana Health Care, Inc., Molokai Community Health Center; (6)  Waimanalo Health Center, Hale Ola Akahi; (7)  Waimanalo Health Center, Hale Ola Alua; and (8)  The Wahiawa Center for Community Health. The grant shall be used to close financing gaps for eligible projects, leverage private and incentive-based funding, and advance energy resilience, continuity of health care services during emergencies, and long-term operating cost reductions for participating community health centers. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 as a grant pursuant to chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for the Hawaii Primary Care Association to provide programmatic services, project management, contract management, reporting and fiscal stewardship responsibilities, and developing future scalable plans for the development and deployment of solar‑plus‑storage microgrids at nonprofit community health centers located in medically underserved communities across the State. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.